Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 24 Appellate Proceedings

9-24-1.
Filing of appeal.

Any party aggrieved by a final judgment, decree, or order of the superior court may, within the time prescribed by applicable procedural rules, appeal to the supreme court. Subject to the provisions of applicable procedural rules, the party appealing shall file a claim of appeal in the office of the clerk of the court from which the appeal is taken, and shall deposit with the clerk an amount not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) as prescribed by the rules and regulations of the supreme court, in addition to a technology surcharge assessed in accordance with §

8-15-11

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 328; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 541, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3497, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3752, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 41; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 10; P.L. 1975, ch. 244, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 34, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 42, § 4.

9-24-2 — 9-24-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 328-332; P.L. 1906, ch. 1351, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, §§ 25-29; P.L. 1921, ch. 2086, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, §§ 25-29; G.L. 1938, ch. 541, §§ 1-5; P.L. 1955, ch. 3497, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3752, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

9-24-2

to 9-24-6; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 42, effective January 10, 1966.

9-24-7.
Appeals from interlocutory orders and judgments.

Whenever, upon a hearing in the superior court, an injunction shall be granted or continued, or a receiver appointed, or a sale of real or personal property ordered, by an interlocutory order or judgment, or a new trial is ordered or denied after a trial by jury, an appeal may be taken from such order or judgment to the supreme court in like manner as from a final judgment, and the appeal shall take precedence in the supreme court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 337; P.L. 1906, ch. 1351, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 541, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-7

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 41.

9-24-8.
Supreme court orders for protection of parties pending appeal.

After an appeal has been entered in the supreme court, the court may make such orders as are needful to protect the rights of the parties pending the appeal, and orders for continuing, modifying, or annulling orders provisionally made by the superior court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 334; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 544, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-8

.

9-24-9.
Summons of additional parties on appeal or certification.

The supreme court, in any cause pending before it on appeal or certification, may order any person having an interest in the subject matter, not a party to the cause, to be summoned in and made a party thereto.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 340; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 544, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-9

.

9-24-10.
New evidence on appeal.

No new testimony shall be presented to the supreme court on appeal, but in case of accident or mistake, or erroneous ruling excluding evidence in the superior court, the supreme court may grant leave to parties to present further evidence, and may provide by general rule or special order for the taking of such evidence.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 333; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 541, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-10

.

9-24-11.
Hearing and determination of appeals.

Upon any cause being brought by appeal to the supreme court, that court shall hear and determine the appeal and affirm, reverse, or modify the decree or judgment appealed from, and make such orders and decrees therein as shall be just.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 335; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 544, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-11

.

9-24-12.
Remand after decision on appeal — Further proceedings.

Upon reversal or modification of the decree or judgment appealed from, the supreme court may remand the cause to the superior court with such directions as are necessary and proper, or may take such further proceedings in the cause as justice and the speedy determination of the cause may require, and after the proceedings shall remand the cause. In any such case, the supreme court, if practicable, shall determine the form of the final decree or judgment before remanding the cause to the superior court. In case the supreme court shall affirm the decree or judgment appealed from, it shall certify its affirmation and remand the cause to the superior court for further proceedings. In every case, the supreme court, upon remanding a cause to the superior court, shall transmit all the papers in the cause to the superior court, and the final decree or judgment shall be entered in the superior court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 336; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 544, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-12

.

9-24-13 — 9-24-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, §§ 481-483; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, §§ 8-10; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, §§ 8-10; P.L. 1929, ch. 1336, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 542, §§ 1-3; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 41; Repealed by P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 11.

9-24-16.
Notice to parties of decisions.

The clerk shall give immediate notice to the parties, or to their attorneys of record, of final decisions in causes heard by the court without a jury, of decisions upon motions for a new trial and in arrest of judgment, and of decisions upon all interlocutory matters, in such manner as the court shall by general rule or special order prescribe; provided, that if any such decision shall be rendered immediately upon the close of a hearing, the notice shall not be required.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 484; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, § 11; P.L. 1909, ch. 426, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 542, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-16

.

9-24-17 — 9-24-24.
Repealed.

History of Section.

Sections

9-24-17

, 9-24-18, and 9-24-20 — 9-24-24 (C.P.A. 1905, §§ 490-495, 497; P.L. 1907, ch. 1460, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, §§ 17-22, 24; P.L. 1921, ch. 2086, §§ 1-4; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, §§ 17-22, 24; P.L. 1929, ch. 1403, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 542, §§ 5-10, 12; P.L. 1956, ch. 3752, § 2; G.L. 1956, §§

9-24-17

, 9-24-18, 9-24-20 — 9-24-24; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 41; Repealed by P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 11. Section 9-24-19 (G.L., ch. 348, § 25, as enacted by P.L. 1931, ch. 1802, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 542, § 13; G.L. 1956, § 9-24-19; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 42.

9-24-25.
Certification to supreme court on agreed statement of facts.

Whenever any civil action, legal or equitable in character, is pending in a district court or in a superior court, and the parties shall file in the clerk’s office an agreed statement of facts in the action, the court shall certify the action to the supreme court to be there heard and determined. After having decided the action, the supreme court shall send back the papers therein, with its decision certified thereon, to the court from which the action was certified, which shall enter final judgment upon the decision.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 477; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 545, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-25

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 41.

Form.

The court accepted certification for hearing and determination on an agreed statement of facts under this section as moved by the plaintiff in the lower court, although the case arrived under a consent order which certified three stated questions under §

9-24-27

, because of the extreme public interest, but stated that failure to reject the improper certification was not precedential. North Kingstown v. North Kingstown Teachers Ass'n,

110 R.I. 698

, 297 A.2d 342,

1972 R.I. LEXIS 969

(1972).

9-24-26.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 339; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 545, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-26

; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 42, effective January 10, 1966.

9-24-27.
Certifications of questions of importance to the supreme court.

Whenever in any proceedings, civil or criminal, legal or equitable, in the superior court or in any district court, any question of law shall arise or the constitutionality of an act of the general assembly shall be brought in question upon the record, which, in the opinion of the court, or in the opinion of the attorney general if the state is a party to the proceeding or if he or she has intervened therein, is of such doubt and importance and so affects the merits of the controversy that it ought to be determined by the supreme court before further proceedings, the court in which the cause is pending shall certify the question or motion to the supreme court for that purpose and stay all further proceedings until the question is heard and determined; provided, that no question shall be so certified in any criminal case where the defendant has not been released on bail.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 478; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, § 5; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 545, § 6; P.L. 1940, ch. 941, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-27

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 41.

Form of Certification.

Supreme court would determine question involved, though question was not stated in certificate, where it was reasonably clear what question was involved, but without any intention to set a precedent. United States Trust Co. v. Tax Assessors,

47 R.I. 420

, 133 A. 802,

1926 R.I. LEXIS 75

(1926).

The court accepted certification for hearing and determination on an agreed statement of facts under §

9-24-25

as moved in the lower court, although the case arrived under a consent order which certified three stated questions under this section, because of the extreme public interest, but stated that the failure to reject the improper certification was not precedential. North Kingstown v. North Kingstown Teachers Ass'n,

110 R.I. 698

, 297 A.2d 342,

1972 R.I. LEXIS 969

(1972).

9-24-28.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 338; G.L. 1909, ch. 289, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 339, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 545, § 7; G. L. 1956, §

9-24-28

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 41; Repealed by P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 11.

9-24-29.
Transmission of papers on certified cases.

Whenever any proceeding or question has been certified to the supreme court, the clerk of the court by which the certification is made shall forthwith transmit the papers to the supreme court, and the parties shall follow the cause to the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 479; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 545, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-29

.

9-24-30.
Return of cause to court from which certified.

The supreme court, after having decided any cause or any question certified to it by a district court or the superior court, shall send back the papers in the cause, with its decision certified thereon, to the court from which the question or cause was certified, where all further proceedings shall be had.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 480; G.L. 1909, ch. 298, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 348, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 545, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-30

.

9-24-31.
Judgment on dismissal or abandonment of appellate proceeding.

Whenever any party, having commenced an appellate proceeding from any court or tribunal, whether by appeal or otherwise, shall fail to perfect the proceeding, or the court appealed to shall have dismissed the proceeding, the court or tribunal from which the proceeding was taken shall, on motion, at once enter such judgment, order, or decree, and as of such date, as the nature of the case may require, and may impose such additional costs and fines as the court deems just.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 440; G.L. 1909, ch. 294, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 344, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 543, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-24-31

.

9-24-32.
State’s right to appeal.

In any criminal proceeding, the attorney general shall have the right to object to any finding, ruling, decision, order, or judgment of the superior court or family court, and the attorney general may appeal the findings, rulings, decisions, orders, or judgments to the supreme court at any time before the defendant has been placed in jeopardy; the defendant in any criminal proceeding may also appeal any findings, rulings, decision, order, or judgment of the superior or family court; and the attorney general may appeal thereafter, if, after trial, the defendant appeals. If the attorney general appeals the findings, rulings, decisions, orders, or judgments of the superior or family court before the defendant is placed in jeopardy and the defendant prevails in the supreme court, the attorney for the defendant shall be entitled to a reasonable attorney’s fee and costs, payable by the state, to be set by the supreme court, incurred in representing the defendant in the prosecution of the attorney general’s appeal before the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 10.

9-24-33.
Procedure for state’s appeal.

The attorney general shall file notice of his or her intention to appeal to the supreme court with the clerk of the superior or family court, together with a written request to the court stenographer for a transcript for so much of the testimony as may be required, within twenty (20) days after any adverse finding, ruling, decision, order, or judgment is entered or made, when such has been entered or made, before the defendant has been placed in jeopardy; and the filing shall stay the finding, ruling, decision, order, or judgment which the attorney general is appealing; and if after trial, the defendant has filed notice of his or her intention to appeal to the supreme court, the attorney general shall file notice of his or her intention to appeal to the supreme court within twenty (20) days thereof, in the same manner as provided. An appeal taken pursuant to this section shall proceed in accordance with the rules of appellate procedure of the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 10.